Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-620
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Community Corrections Act:

(1) Provide for the development and establishment of community-based facilities and programs in Nebraska for adult offenders and encourage the use of such facilities and programs by sentencing courts and the Board of Parole as alternatives to incarceration or reincarceration, in order to reduce prison overcrowding and enhance offender supervision in the community; and

(2) Serve the interests of society by promoting the rehabilitation of offenders and deterring offenders from engaging in further criminal activity, by making community-based facilities and programs available to adult offenders while emphasizing offender culpability, offender accountability, and public safety and reducing reliance upon incarceration as a means of managing nonviolent offenders.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 32;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 45.